California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.2.

“Title policy” means any written instrument or contract by means of which title insurance liability is assumed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.3.

“Business of title insurance” includes:

(a) Issuing or proposing to issue any title policy as insurer, guarantor, or indemnitor;

(b) Transacting or proposing to transact any phase of title insurance, including solicitation, negotiation preliminary to execution, or execution of a title policy, insuring and transacting matters subsequent to the execution of a title policy and arising out of such policy, excluding reinsurance;

(c) The performance by a title
 insurer, an underwritten title company or a controlled escrow company of any service in conjunction with the issuance or contemplated issuance of a title policy including but not limited to the handling of any escrow, settlement or closing in connection therewith; or the doing of or proposing to do any business, which is in substance the equivalent of any of the above.

(d) The issuance, by a title insurer, of a letter of indemnity. Any such letter of indemnity shall be limited to and issued solely for the purpose of indemnifying the commissioner on behalf of any member of the public who transacts an escrow with an underwritten title company, with whom the title insurer has an underwriting agreement. A title insurer may charge a reasonable fee in connection with the issuance of any such letter. No rate or form filing shall be required with respect to any such letter of indemnity.

(e) The act of an insurer in furnishing in writing to a prospective purchaser of the insurer’s title policy a statement which assures, and assumes the liability for, the proper performance of services necessary to the conduct of a real estate closing performed by an underwritten title company with whom the insurer maintains an underwriting agreement. A title insurer may charge a reasonable fee in connection with the furnishing of any such statement. No rate or form filing shall be required with respect to any such statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 479, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.4.

“Title insurer” means any company issuing title policies as insurer, guarantor or indemnitor.

“Domestic title insurer” means any title insurer organized under the laws of this state.

“Foreign title insurer” means any title insurer organized under the laws of any other jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.5.

“Underwritten title company” means any corporation engaged in the business of preparing title searches, title examinations, title reports, certificates or abstracts of title upon the basis of which a title insurer writes title policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.6.

(a) “Controlled escrow company” means any person, other than a title insurer or underwritten title company, whose principal business is the handling of escrows of real property transactions in connection with which title policies are issued, which person, if an artificial person, directly or indirectly, is controlled by, controls, or is under common control with a title insurer, or controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with an underwritten title company, or, if a natural person, is employed by, or controlled by, a title insurer or by an underwritten title company. As used in this section, the term “control” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 1215.

(b) Except for Article 6 (commencing
 with Section 12404), this section does not apply to any person or entity doing business under any law of this state or the United States relating to banks or savings and loan associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 31.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.7.

Except as provided in Section 12401.8, and excluding miscellaneous charges, “rate” or “rates” means the charge or charges, whether denominated premium or otherwise, made to the public by a title insurer, an underwritten title company or a controlled escrow company, for all services it performs in transacting the business of title insurance. As used in this section miscellaneous charges means conveyancing fees, notary fees, inspection fees, tax service contract fees and such other fees as the commissioner by regulation may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.8.

“Advisory organization” means every person or entity (other than a title insurer, underwritten title company, or controlled escrow company) which recommends or prepares policy forms or endorsements, or procedural manuals (but not including the making of rates, rating plans, or rating systems), or which collects and furnishes to its members or insurance supervisory officials loss and expense statistics or other statistical information and data relating to the business of title insurance and who otherwise acts in an advisory, as distinguished from a ratemaking,
 capacity. No duly authorized attorney at law acting in the usual course of his profession nor any entity engaging in the above activity on a nationwide basis shall be deemed to be an advisory organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 991, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.9.

“Willful” or “willfully” in relation to an act or omission which constitutes a violation of this chapter means with actual knowledge or belief that such act or omission constitutes such violation and with specific intent to commit such violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1130.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.10.

“Abstract of title” is a written representation, provided pursuant to a contract, whether written or oral, intended to be relied upon by the person who has contracted for the receipt of such representation, listing all recorded conveyances, instruments or documents which, under the laws of this state, impart constructive notice with respect to the chain of title to the real property described therein. An abstract of title is not a title policy as defined in Section 12340.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 55, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.11.

“Preliminary report”, “commitment”, or “binder” are reports furnished in connection with an application for title insurance and are offers to issue a title policy subject to the stated exceptions set forth in the reports and such other matters as may be incorporated by reference therein. The reports are not abstracts of title, nor are any of the rights, duties or responsibilities applicable to the preparation and issuance of an abstract of title applicable to the issuance of any report. Any such report shall not be construed as, nor constitute, a representation as to the condition of title to real property, but shall constitute a statement of the terms
 and conditions upon which the issuer is willing to issue its title policy, if such offer is accepted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 55, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12340.13.

“Business location” means a facility or other place of business in this state where an underwritten title company or controlled escrow company engages in the business of conducting escrow services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 370, Sec. 1.   (AB 704)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12342.

For purposes of this chapter, “holders of liens or encumbrances” includes, but is not limited to, the institutional third parties described in Sections 1452 and 1717 of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 433, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Title Insurers; Capital and Guarantee Fund Requirements [12350. - 12360.]

12350.

Every title insurer, before issuing any policy, shall deposit $100,000 with the Insurance Commissioner or other designated official of its home State as a “guarantee fund” for the security and protection of the holders of, or beneficiaries under, its title policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

12351.

Any such deposit may be made either in lawful money of the United States or in any of the securities, other than collateral trust bonds or notes, authorized for investment, other than excess funds investments, of all the assets of domestic incorporated insurers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12352.

If the deposit is made in this state, it shall first be approved by the commissioner who shall make a special deposit thereof in the State Treasury, for the purpose specified in Section 12350. The Treasurer shall give his or her receipt therefor, to the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 426, Sec. 12.   (SB 712)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

12353.

Except as provided in section 12355, assets in such deposits in this State may, with the approval of the commissioner, be withdrawn or exchanged from time to time for other assets of like character and value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

12354.

As long as the depositing insurer continues solvent, it shall receive the interest and dividends on any assets in the deposit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12355.

Except on withdrawal of the insurer from this State, or substitution pursuant to section 12353, assets in the deposit in this State shall be subject to final sale, transfer, and disposal of the proceeds thereof by the commissioner only on the order of a court of competent jurisdiction and for the security and protection of the holders of, or beneficiaries under, the depositing insurers title insurance policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

12356.

When any part of the assets to be deposited in this State consists of mortgage-secured notes or bonds, or loans upon real property secured by mortgage, such mortgages shall be accompanied by a policy of mortgage insurance issued under the provisions of this code, or by evidence of title issued by a person designated or approved by the commissioner and either authorized by law or found by the commissioner to be competent to issue such evidence. Such evidence of title shall consist either of a full abstract of title, a full certificate of title, or a policy of title insurance, and shall be assigned and approved by, or under the direction of, the commissioner.

In any case where he ascertains that the expense thereof would not be unreasonable or such as to make the deposit impracticable, the commissioner may require a policy of title insurance or a guaranty that the abstract is correct and that it shows title to be in the proper party, issued by a corporation authorized to issue such policies or guaranties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

12357.

Unless the mortgage is covered by mortgage insurance, the value of the property covered by each such mortgage constituting all or part of such deposit in this State shall be appraised by one or more appraisers selected or approved by the commissioner. The appraisers shall be familiar with property values of the particular type of property and generally in the region in which the property or some part thereof is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

12358.

The reasonable cost of examining such evidence of title and of making such appraisement, shall be paid by the title insurer making the deposit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

12359.

A title insurer shall not transact any insurance in this state unless it has paid-in capital represented by shares of stock of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 479, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12360.

An insurer which anywhere in the United States transacts any class of insurance other than title insurance is not eligible for the issuance of a certificate of authority to transact title insurance in this State nor for the renewal thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 542.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Title Insurers: Finances and Investments [12370. - 12377.]

12370.

Every title insurer shall annually set apart a sum equal to 10 percent of its premiums collected during the year. Such sums shall be allowed to accumulate until a fund is created equal in amount to 25 percent of the aggregate of the subscribed capital stock of the insurer, or one million dollars ($1,000,000), whichever is the lower amount. After the establishment by a title insurer of an unearned premium reserve, pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 12380) of this chapter, such amount shall be reduced by the aggregate amount which shall be set aside and maintained by such insurer in such unearned premium reserve. Such fund shall be known as the “title insurance
 surplus fund.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1318.)
-------------------------------------------

12371.

The title insurance surplus fund shall be maintained as a further security to holders and beneficiaries of the title policies issued by the insurer. If all or any part of the fund shall at any time be in excess of the amount required by Section 12370, such excess may be transferred by the insurer to its general assets. If at any time the fund is impaired by reason of a loss, the amount by which it is impaired shall be restored in the manner provided for its accumulation. The reporting of a loss is an impairment of such fund for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12372.

Any such domestic insurer, after having its required capital paid in and depositing its required guarantee fund with the State Treasurer, may invest its funds in the preparation and purchase of materials and plant necessary to enable it to engage in the title insurance business. In all statements and proceedings required by law for the ascertainment and determination of the condition of such insurer, such materials and plant shall be treated in one of the following ways:

(a) They may be treated as an asset, valued at actual cost to the insurer not in excess of 50 per cent of the aggregate par value of the
 shares of the insurer’s capital stock then issued outstanding, and apportioned to its title insurance department, including treasury shares; 

(b) They may be treated as an asset, at such lesser value than that permitted by paragraph (a) of this section as the insurer estimates;

(c) They may be omitted entirely from the statement or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 325.)
-------------------------------------------

12372.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 12372, where a title plant is not being currently maintained, the asset value of such plant shall not exceed its asset value as of the last annual statement date preceding the first month such plant is not currently maintained, less 110th thereof for each succeeding year or part thereof that such plant is not being currently maintained. For the purposes of this section, a title plant shall be deemed currently maintained so long as it is used in the normal conduct of the business of title insurance, and (1) the owner thereof continues
 regularly to obtain and index title record data to such plant or to a continuation thereof in a format other than that previously used, including, but not limited to, computerization of such data, or (2) the owner thereof is a participant, in an arrangement for joint use of a title plant system regularly maintained in any format, provided such owner is contractually entitled to receive a copy of the title record data contained in such jointly used title plant system during the period of such owner’s participation therein, either periodically or upon termination of such participation, at a cost not to exceed the actual cost of duplication of such title record data.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 846.)
-------------------------------------------

12373.

A title insurer shall not make any dividends except from profits remaining on hand after retaining unimpaired assets aggregating in value an amount equal to the sum of the following:

(a) The aggregate par value of the shares of its capital stock issued and outstanding, including treasury shares;

(b) The amount required to be set apart as the title insurance surplus fund; 

(c) The amount required to be maintained in the unearned premium reserve;

(d) The amount required to be maintained in the reserve for unpaid losses and loss adjustment expense;

(e) A sum sufficient to pay all liabilities for expenses and taxes and all other indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12374.

Except as otherwise authorized by subdivision (g) of Section 1105, a title insurer shall not directly or indirectly make a loan from its assets to any of its officers, directors or employees, or to any member of the family of any officer or director. Any officer, director, agent, or employee of any such insurer who knowingly consents to any violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 55, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12375.

Whenever a title insurer, upon withdrawing from insurance business in this State, desires to reinsure its policies with a title insurer whose “title insurance surplus fund” is not fully made up, the commissioner may require the reinsurer to increase its “title insurance surplus fund.” The amount of increase shall not be greater than the amount in the withdrawing insurer’s “title insurance surplus fund” nor greater than will fully make up the reinsurer’s title insurance surplus fund. Such increase may be made a condition of the commissioner’s approval of the reinsurance plan.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12376.

(a) If an underwritten title company is placed into bankruptcy, receivership, or conservation by the commissioner, each title insurer operating under an underwriting agreement with the underwritten title company during the six months prior to the earliest of the conservation, bankruptcy, or receivership shall be liable for its proportionate share of the commissioner’s costs and any escrow and subescrow account shortages as determined by the calculations set forth in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) If, during the six months prior to the earliest of the establishment of a conservation, bankruptcy, or receivership under subdivision (a), the underwritten title company was authorized by underwriting agreements to issue title policies for more than one title insurer, the liability of each title insurer is determined by multiplying the amount of the total escrow and subescrow shortages, as well as the costs, and expenses, as set forth in subdivision (c), by that title insurer’s percentage of the underwritten title company’s net premiums for policies issued by each title insurer during the 12-month period preceding the earliest of the establishment of the conservation, bankruptcy, or receivership, with each title insurer’s liability pursuant to this subdivision to be referred to as its proportionate share.

(c) When determining the total proportionate liability of each title insurer,
 the commissioner shall include the following:

(1) The commissioner’s costs and expenses of seizing and taking control of the underwritten title company’s offices, operations, and assets.

(2) The commissioner’s costs and expenses of handling, adjusting, and closing all subescrow and escrow accounts, including the costs and expenses of determining whether shortages exist in any subescrow and escrow accounts.

(3) Other costs and expenses incurred by the commissioner in connection with borrowing from the Insurance Fund pursuant to subdivision (g) and foregone earnings or interest of the Insurance Fund resulting from the borrowing.

As used in this subdivision, “commissioner’s costs and expenses” includes the costs and expenses of all agents and contractors retained by the
 commissioner in performing functions set forth in this subdivision, and “subescrow” and “escrow” means title subescrows and escrows. These calculations shall result in 100 percent of the shortage, costs, and expenses being proportionately allocated to each title insurer authorized to issue title policies in the last six months preceding the underwritten title company being placed into bankruptcy, receivership, or conservation.

(d) (1) The commissioner shall make an initial estimate of the total shortage in the escrow and subescrow accounts and the commissioner’s costs and expenses as provided in subdivision (c) and shall provide this estimate in writing to each title insurer determined to have liability under this section as soon as practicable. The initial estimate shall be substantiated by a summary of the accounting information pertinent to the commissioner’s estimate of the escrow and subescrow shortfalls and the
 commissioner’s costs and expenses.

(2) The commissioner shall make further estimates, as necessary, of the total shortage in the escrow and subescrow accounts and the commissioner’s costs and expenses as provided in subdivision (c) and shall provide the estimates in writing to each title insurer determined to have liability under this section. These estimates shall be substantiated by a detailed summary of pertinent accounting information.

(3) After receiving an estimate pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), each title insurer having liability under this section shall, within 30 days after written notification, deposit its proportionate share of the shortage, costs, and expenses into an escrow account established by the commissioner for the purpose of reimbursement to subescrow or escrow accountholders, reimbursement to the commissioner in the event that the commissioner advances or
 has advanced payments to subescrow or escrow accountholders, or payment or reimbursement of the commissioner’s costs and expenses pursuant to subdivision (c). If a title insurer fails to make a payment required by this subdivision within the 30-day period, the title insurer shall pay a penalty calculated at the rate of 10 percent per annum on the unpaid amount until the payment is received by the commissioner.

(e) Nothing in this section relieves a person of liability under any other provision of law that he or she may have for a shortage as set forth in subdivision (a). A title insurer, on becoming liable for a shortage as set forth in this section, is entitled to enforce every available remedy, or bring any cause of action that would have been available to a person compensated by the title insurer.

(f) A title insurer shall be entitled to make a claim for reimbursement for
 subescrow or escrow shortages paid to subescrow or escrow accountholders and for payments of its proportionate share pursuant to subdivision (c). Those claims shall be given the same preference as those claims referenced in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1033.

(g) A title insurer shall be entitled to make a claim for reimbursement for payment of its proportionate share of the commissioner’s costs and expenses paid pursuant to subdivision (c). Those claims shall be given the same preference as those claims referenced in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1033. The commissioner shall return to each title insurer its proportional share of any funds remaining in the escrow account after all liabilities in subdivision (a) have been satisfied.

(h) In order to minimize potential losses and negative impacts on consumers having money in escrow accounts held by an
 underwritten title company taken into conservation, bankruptcy, or receivership by the commissioner, the commissioner shall hire all necessary escrow consultants or other experts necessary to achieve this goal.

(i) The commissioner may borrow from the Insurance Fund to cover shortages in subescrow or escrow accounts and to pay costs and expenses set forth in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 899, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12377.

(a) All escrow funds received by an underwritten title company that are subject to Section 12413.5 shall not be considered part of the estate of the underwritten title company for purposes of liquidation, receivership, bankruptcy, or conservation pursuant to Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(b) Where an underwritten title company is placed into conservation, receivership, or bankruptcy and the escrow accounts held by the company
 are found to have shortages, the department, conservator, liquidator, receiver, or bankruptcy trustee shall do everything reasonably possible to trace these moneys to other depository accounts or assets.

(c) Any real or personal property traceable to shortages in the escrow accounts shall not be considered part of the estate available to other claimants under Section 1033. Those assets shall be liquidated and paid in the following order: (1) if the commissioner has paid or advanced funds to subescrow or escrow accountholders from sources other than the escrow established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12376, they shall be paid to the commissioner to the extent that the commissioner has not been repaid by title insurers having liability under Section 12376, (2) they shall be deposited into an escrow established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12376, and (3) they shall be directly reimbursed to the title insurer or insurers that
 have reimbursed escrow depositors under Section 12376. In no event shall a title insurer be reimbursed an amount in excess of its liability as determined in Section 12376.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 899, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Unearned Premium Reserve and Reserve for Unpaid Losses and Loss Expense [12380. - 12388.]

12380.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Total charges for policies of title insurance” means (i) the total of fees and charges as shown on policies, as required by Section 12412, less any amount paid for coinsurance of such policy to any coinsuring title insurer and (ii) the total sum charged by any coinsuring title insurer for acting as a coinsurer in respect to any policy of title insurance.

(b) “Ceding company” means a title insurer which shall have purchased a policy or contract of reinsurance from a reinsuring company.

(c) “Reinsuring company” means a title insurer which shall have sold a policy or contract of reinsurance to a ceding company.

(d) “Unearned premium reserve” means that reserve that is generally known as the statutory premium reserve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 974, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

12381.

Every domestic title insurer shall, in addition to other reserves, establish and maintain a reserve to be known as the “unearned premium reserve” for title insurance, which shall, at all times for all purposes, be deemed and shall constitute the unearned portion of premiums due or received on all of its business wherever transacted and shall be charged as a reserve liability of such title insurer in determining its financial condition. The unearned premium reserve shall be retained and held by such title insurer for the protection of the policyholders’ interest in policies which have not expired. Except as provided in Section 12385, assets equal to the amount of such reserve
 shall not be subject to distribution among depositors or other creditors or stockholders of such title insurer until all claims of holders of policies and contracts of title insurance of such title insurer have been paid in full and all liability on the policies or other contracts of title insurance, whether contingent or actual, has been discharged or lawfully reinsured. Income from the investment of all or any part of such reserve shall be the unrestricted property of the title insurer.

Every admitted foreign insurer shall maintain a like reserve under like conditions in respect to its California business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12382.

The unearned premium reserve of every title insurer shall consist of:

(a) Such amount as would have been required to be set aside in said reserve on all policies or contracts of title insurance issued during the calendar years 1962, 1963 and 1964, if this article had been effective at and after the date that such policies or contracts were written, less the amount of withdrawals that would have been permitted if this article had been so effective; and

(b) The amount of all additions required to be made to such reserve by this article less the
 withdrawals therefrom permitted by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12382.2.

(a) Out of total charges for policies of title insurance, a title insurer shall add to and set aside in its unearned premium reserve commencing as of January 1, 1965, an amount equal to 2 percent of those total charges for policies of title insurance, which amount shall be deemed and shall constitute the unearned premiums due or received from all such policies or contracts. Except as otherwise provided in Section 12382.6, if any policy of title insurance shall be reinsured, the reinsuring company shall be required to set aside in its
 unearned premium reserve only that portion, if any, of that 2 percent as shall have not theretofore been set aside by the ceding company. This subdivision shall apply to policies issued and reinsured prior to January 1, 1988.

(b) Out of total charges for policies of title insurance, a title insurer shall add to and set aside in its unearned premium reserve, an amount equal to 212 percent of those total charges for policies of title insurance, which amount shall be deemed and shall constitute the unearned premiums due or received from all such policies or contracts. Except as otherwise provided in Section 12382.6, if any policy of title insurance shall be reinsured, the reinsurer shall be required to set aside in its unearned premium reserve only that portion, if any, of the
 212 percent as shall have not theretofore been set aside by the ceding company. This subdivision shall apply to policies issued and reinsured on and after January 1, 1988, and prior to January 1, 1994.

(c) Out of total charges for policies of title insurance and, commencing no later than the year beginning January 1, 1994, a title insurer shall add to and set aside in its unearned premium reserve an amount equal to 412 percent of the sum of the following items, for all jurisdictions where the title insurer operates, set forth in the title insurer’s annual statement filed in this state:

(1) “Direct premiums written” as set forth in Schedule T.

(2) “Other income” as set forth in Schedule T.

(3) “Premiums written during year—reinsurance assumed” less “Premiums for reinsurance ceded during year.”

(d) The insurer shall calculate an adjusted unearned premium reserve as of December 31, 1993. The adjusted unearned premium reserve shall be calculated as if subdivision (c) of this section and subdivision (c) of Section 12382.5 had been in effect for all years beginning on or after January 1, 1974. For purposes of this calculation, the balance of the unearned premium reserve as of December 31, 1973, shall be deemed to be zero. If the adjusted unearned premium reserve so calculated exceeds the aggregate amount set aside for unearned premiums in the insurer’s December 31, 1993, Annual Statement (Form 9), the insurer shall, out of total charges for policies of title
 insurance, increase its unearned premium reserve by an amount that is not less than one-sixth of that excess in each of the succeeding six years, commencing no later than the year beginning January 1, 1994, until the entire excess has been added.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 353, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12382.3.

The aggregate amount set aside in the unearned premium reserve shall be separately recorded and reserved in respect to such policies and contracts issued in each calendar year. All amounts set aside as additions to the unearned premium reserve, to the extent that the same have not previously been deducted from net profits or earned surplus, shall be deducted in determining net profits of any title insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12382.4.

For the purpose of determining the amounts of the unearned premium reserve that may be withdrawn pursuant to Section 12382.5 and the interest of the policyholders therein under Section 12385, all policies and contracts of title insurance or reinsurance shall be considered as dated on July 1 of the year of issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12382.5.

(a) The aggregate of the amounts set aside in unearned premium reserve in any calendar year pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12382.2 shall be released from that reserve and restored to net profits pursuant to the following formula: one-tenth of that aggregate sum on July 1 of each of the five years next succeeding the year of addition to the reserve and one-thirtieth of that aggregate sum on July 1 of each succeeding year thereafter until the entire sum shall have been so released and restored to net profits. The aggregate of the
 amounts set aside in unearned premium reserve pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 12382 shall be released from the reserve and restored to net profits and surplus pursuant to the foregoing formula, provided that the amounts so set aside shall be treated as if subdivision (a) of Section 12382 and this section had been effective during the calendar years 1962, 1963, and 1964.

(b) The aggregate of the amounts set aside in unearned premium reserve in any calendar year pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12382.2 shall be released from the reserve and restored to net profits pursuant to the following formula: one-tenth of the aggregate sum on July 1 of each of the 10 years next succeeding the year of addition to the reserve until the entire sum shall have been so released and restored to net profits.

(c) The aggregate of the amounts set aside in unearned premium reserve in any
 calendar year pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 12382.2 shall be released from the reserve and restored to net profits over a period of 20 years pursuant to the following formula: 10 percent of the aggregate sum on July 1 of each of the five years next succeeding the year of addition; 9 percent of the aggregate sum on July 1 of each of the next succeeding five years; and one-half of 1 percent of the aggregate sum on July 1 of each of the last 10 years.

(d) The aggregate of the amounts set aside in unearned premium reserve in any calendar year as adjustments to the insurer’s unearned premium reserve pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 12382.2 shall be released from the reserve and restored to net profits, or equity if the additions required by subdivision (d) of Section 12382.2 reduced equity directly, over a period not exceeding 10 years pursuant to the following table:Year of additionRelease1994, or earlierEqually over 10 years1995Equally over 9 years1996Equally over 8 years1997Equally over 7 years1998Equally over 6 years1999Equally over 5 years

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 353, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12382.6.

If substantially the entire outstanding liability under all policies and contracts of title insurance or reinsurance of any ceding company shall be reinsured, pursuant to and as authorized by Section 12385, the total charge received by any reinsuring company authorized to transact the business of title insurance in this state shall constitute, in its entirety, unearned portions of original premiums, and shall be added to its unearned premium reserve and shall be deemed, for recovery purposes, to have been provided for liabilities assumed during the year of such reinsurance. The amount of such addition to the unearned premium reserve of such reinsuring company shall be not
 less than two-thirds (23rds) of the amount of the unearned premium reserve required to be maintained by the ceding company at the time of such reinsurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12383.

All amounts set aside in the unearned premium reserve of a title insurer shall be held either as cash on hand or shall be deposited or invested in those investments suitable for the investment of trust funds, as provided in Section 16040 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 187, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

12384.

If the aggregate amount set aside by a title insurer in its unearned premium reserve should at any time be less than the amount required to be maintained in such reserve, and the deficiency shall not be promptly cured, such title insurer shall forthwith give written notice thereof to the commissioner. Any such title insurer shall not thereafter issue any further policies or contracts of title insurance or reinsurance until the deficiency shall have been eliminated and until it shall have received written approval from the commissioner authorizing it to again issue such policies and contracts of title insurance and reinsurance. For the purpose of determining the aggregate
 amount set aside by a title insurer in its unearned premium reserve, any portion of such reserve which shall have been invested shall be valued at the purchase price or the fair market value of such investment on the date that such investment was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12385.

If a title insurer shall at any time become insolvent, be in the process of liquidation or dissolution or be in the possession of the commissioner, all amounts set aside in the unearned premium reserve shall be used and applied as follows:

(a) Such amount up to the whole of the reserve as is necessary may be used with the written approval of the commissioner to pay for reinsurance of the liability of such title insurer under all outstanding policies and contracts of title insurance or reinsurance as to which claims for losses by holders thereof are not then pending. The amount of the unearned premium reserve not
 so used shall be transferred to the general assets of the title insurer to be held and distributed subject to the limitations imposed by this section.
